Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-702.03
Streets; egress and ingress; rights to.

The right of reasonably convenient egress to and ingress from lands or lots, abutting on an existing highway, street, or road within a city of the primary class, may not be denied except with the consent of the owners of such lands or lots, or with the condemnation of such right of access to and from such abutting lands or lots. If the construction or reconstruction of any highway, street, or road, to be paid for in whole or in part with federal or state highway funds, results in the abutment of property on such highway, street, or road that did not theretofore have direct egress from and ingress to it, no rights of direct access shall accrue because of such abutment, but the city may prescribe and define the location of the privilege of access, if any, of properties that then, but not theretofore, abut on such highway, street, or road.

Laws 1959, c. 45, § 3, p. 227;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 110.

In order for property to "abut" a street, according to the terms of this section, the lot line and street line must be in common; mere touching at a single point is not sufficient. City of Lincoln v. Cather & Sons Const., Inc., 206 Neb. 10, 290 N.W.2d 798 (1980).